Utah statutes.
78B-6-815.   Abandonment.
"Abandonment" is presumed in either of the following situations:
(1)  The tenant has not notified the owner that he or she will be absent from
the premises, and the tenant fails to pay rent within 15 days after the due
date, and there is no reasonable evidence other than the presence of the
tenant's personal property that the tenant is occupying the premises.
(2)  The tenant has not notified the owner that he or she will be absent from
the premises, and the tenant fails to pay rent when due and the tenant's
personal property has been removed from the dwelling unit and there is no
reasonable evidence that the tenant is occupying the premises.
